Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-128
University funds; State Treasurer; custodian; disbursement.

The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of all the funds of the university. Disbursements from the funds named in sections 85-124 to 85-127 shall be made in accordance with the provisions of law relating to the disbursement of university funds in the hands of the State Treasurer as provided by law.

Laws 1869, § 21, p. 177;

Laws 1877, § 1, p. 57;

Laws 1899, c. 76, § 1, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 7106;

C.S.1922, § 6738;

C.S.1929, § 85-124;

R.S.1943, § 85-128.